Alaska statutes. Title 29. Municipal Government.
Chapter 45. Municipal Taxation.

Cross references. —

For prohibition on imposition of a municipal individual income tax, see AS

43.20.290

.

For provision requesting the governor to establish an advisory planning group under AS

44.19.145

to advise the governor on municipal involvement in a North Slope natural gas project and outlining duties and annual reporting requirements for that advisory planning group, including consideration of tax structure under this chapter, see sec. 74, ch. 14, SLA 2014 in the 2014 Temporary and Special Acts.

Collateral references. —

Validity of municipal ordinance imposing income tax or license upon nonresidents employed in taxing jurisdiction (commuter tax). 48 ALR3d 343.

Validity of state or municipal tax or license fee upon occupation of practicing law. 50 ALR4th 467.

Hotel-motel room occupancy tax. 58 ALR4th 274.